Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
150

SEEDS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

150-1 Short title

150-2 Repealed

Part II. Regulation of Sale of Seeds

150-21 Definitions

150-22 Rules

150-23 Prohibiting sales; germination tests

150-24 Agricultural seed; labels

150-25 Vegetable seed; labels

150-26 Removal from sale

150-27 Duties and authority of the department

150-28 Laboratory and analytical procedure

150-29 Seed licenses

150-30 Disposition of fees and charges

150-31 Violations; penalties

Part III. Seed Distribution--Repealed

150-41 Repealed

Note

Chapter title amended by L 1987, c 164, §1.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next